Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201812-532
Mowing.

Any cemetery association shall provide
for at least one mowing annually of the cemetery it manages, and one of such
mowings shall occur within two weeks prior to Memorial Day. Additional mowings
shall be at the discretion of the cemetery association.

Laws 2014, LB863, § 2.